Illinois, session 104th, HB3172.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Sections 1-3.12, 1-3.40, 3-12, 5-1, and 5-3 as 6follows: 7    (235 ILCS 5/1-3.12)  (from Ch. 43, par. 95.12)8    Sec. 1-3.12. "Wine-maker" means a person engaged in the 9making of less than 50,000 gallons of wine annually other than 10a person issued a Second Class wine-maker's license or a 11third-class wine-maker's license.12(Source: P.A. 92-378, eff. 8-16-01.) 13    (235 ILCS 5/1-3.40)14    Sec. 1-3.40. Manufacturer class license holder. 15"Manufacturer class license holder" means any holder of a 16Manufacturer's license as provided in Section 5-1 of this Act. 17The Manufacturer's licenses are: a Class 1. Distiller, a Class 182. Rectifier, a Class 3. Brewer, a Class 4. First Class Wine 19Manufacturer, a Class 5. Second Class Wine Manufacturer, a 20Class 6. First Class Winemaker, a Class 7. Second Class 21Winemaker, a Class 8. Limited Wine Manufacturer, a Class 9. 22Craft Distiller, a Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller, a Class   HB3172- 2 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b111. Class 2 Craft Distiller, a Class 12. Class 1 Brewer, and a 2Class 13. Class 2 Brewer, a Class 14. Third-Class Wine-Maker, 3and any future Manufacturer's licenses established by law.4(Source: P.A. 101-482, eff. 8-23-19; 101-615, eff. 12-20-19.) 5    (235 ILCS 5/3-12)6    Sec. 3-12. Powers and duties of State Commission. 7    (a) The State Commission shall have the following powers, 8functions, and duties: 9        (1) To receive applications and to issue licenses to 10    manufacturers, foreign importers, importing distributors, 11    distributors, non-resident dealers, on premise consumption 12    retailers, off premise sale retailers, special event 13    retailer licensees, special use permit licenses, auction 14    liquor licenses, brew pubs, caterer retailers, 15    non-beverage users, railroads, including owners and 16    lessees of sleeping, dining and cafe cars, airplanes, 17    boats, brokers, and wine maker's premises licensees in 18    accordance with the provisions of this Act, and to suspend 19    or revoke such licenses upon the State Commission's 20    determination, upon notice after hearing, that a licensee 21    has violated any provision of this Act or any rule or 22    regulation issued pursuant thereto and in effect for 30 23    days prior to such violation. Except in the case of an 24    action taken pursuant to a violation of Section 6-3, 6-5, 25    or 6-9, any action by the State Commission to suspend or   HB3172- 3 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    revoke a licensee's license may be limited to the license 2    for the specific premises where the violation occurred. An 3    action for a violation of this Act shall be commenced by 4    the State Commission within 2 years after the date the 5    State Commission becomes aware of the violation. 6        In lieu of suspending or revoking a license, the 7    commission may impose a fine, upon the State Commission's 8    determination and notice after hearing, that a licensee 9    has violated any provision of this Act or any rule or 10    regulation issued pursuant thereto and in effect for 30 11    days prior to such violation.12        For the purpose of this paragraph (1), when 13    determining multiple violations for the sale of alcohol to 14    a person under the age of 21, a second or subsequent 15    violation for the sale of alcohol to a person under the age 16    of 21 shall only be considered if it was committed within 5 17    years after the date when a prior violation for the sale of 18    alcohol to a person under the age of 21 was committed. 19        The fine imposed under this paragraph may not exceed 20    $500 for each violation. Each day that the activity, which 21    gave rise to the original fine, continues is a separate 22    violation. The maximum fine that may be levied against any 23    licensee, for the period of the license, shall not exceed 24    $20,000. The maximum penalty that may be imposed on a 25    licensee for selling a bottle of alcoholic liquor with a 26    foreign object in it or serving from a bottle of alcoholic   HB3172- 4 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    liquor with a foreign object in it shall be the 2    destruction of that bottle of alcoholic liquor for the 3    first 10 bottles so sold or served from by the licensee. 4    For the eleventh bottle of alcoholic liquor and for each 5    third bottle thereafter sold or served from by the 6    licensee with a foreign object in it, the maximum penalty 7    that may be imposed on the licensee is the destruction of 8    the bottle of alcoholic liquor and a fine of up to $50. 9        Any notice issued by the State Commission to a 10    licensee for a violation of this Act or any notice with 11    respect to settlement or offer in compromise shall include 12    the field report, photographs, and any other supporting 13    documentation necessary to reasonably inform the licensee 14    of the nature and extent of the violation or the conduct 15    alleged to have occurred. The failure to include such 16    required documentation shall result in the dismissal of 17    the action.18        (2) To adopt such rules and regulations consistent 19    with the provisions of this Act which shall be necessary 20    to carry on its functions and duties to the end that the 21    health, safety and welfare of the People of the State of 22    Illinois shall be protected and temperance in the 23    consumption of alcoholic liquors shall be fostered and 24    promoted and to distribute copies of such rules and 25    regulations to all licensees affected thereby. 26        (3) To call upon other administrative departments of   HB3172- 5 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    the State, county and municipal governments, county and 2    city police departments and upon prosecuting officers for 3    such information and assistance as it deems necessary in 4    the performance of its duties. 5        (4) To recommend to local commissioners rules and 6    regulations, not inconsistent with the law, for the 7    distribution and sale of alcoholic liquors throughout the 8    State. 9        (5) To inspect, or cause to be inspected, any premises 10    in this State where alcoholic liquors are manufactured, 11    distributed, warehoused, or sold. Nothing in this Act 12    authorizes an agent of the State Commission to inspect 13    private areas within the premises without reasonable 14    suspicion or a warrant during an inspection. "Private 15    areas" include, but are not limited to, safes, personal 16    property, and closed desks. 17        (5.1) Upon receipt of a complaint or upon having 18    knowledge that any person is engaged in business as a 19    manufacturer, importing distributor, distributor, or 20    retailer without a license or valid license, to conduct an 21    investigation. If, after conducting an investigation, the 22    State Commission is satisfied that the alleged conduct 23    occurred or is occurring, it may issue a cease and desist 24    notice as provided in this Act, impose civil penalties as 25    provided in this Act, notify the local liquor authority, 26    or file a complaint with the State's Attorney's Office of   HB3172- 6 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    the county where the incident occurred or the Attorney 2    General. 3        (5.2) Upon receipt of a complaint or upon having 4    knowledge that any person is shipping alcoholic liquor 5    into this State from a point outside of this State if the 6    shipment is in violation of this Act, to conduct an 7    investigation. If, after conducting an investigation, the 8    State Commission is satisfied that the alleged conduct 9    occurred or is occurring, it may issue a cease and desist 10    notice as provided in this Act, impose civil penalties as 11    provided in this Act, notify the foreign jurisdiction, or 12    file a complaint with the State's Attorney's Office of the 13    county where the incident occurred or the Attorney 14    General. 15        (5.3) To receive complaints from licensees, local 16    officials, law enforcement agencies, organizations, and 17    persons stating that any licensee has been or is violating 18    any provision of this Act or the rules and regulations 19    issued pursuant to this Act. Such complaints shall be in 20    writing, signed and sworn to by the person making the 21    complaint, and shall state with specificity the facts in 22    relation to the alleged violation. If the State Commission 23    has reasonable grounds to believe that the complaint 24    substantially alleges a violation of this Act or rules and 25    regulations adopted pursuant to this Act, it shall conduct 26    an investigation. If, after conducting an investigation,   HB3172- 7 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    the State Commission is satisfied that the alleged 2    violation did occur, it shall proceed with disciplinary 3    action against the licensee as provided in this Act. 4        (5.4) To make arrests and issue notices of civil 5    violations where necessary for the enforcement of this 6    Act. 7        (5.5) To investigate any and all unlicensed activity. 8        (5.6) To impose civil penalties or fines to any person 9    who, without holding a valid license, engages in conduct 10    that requires a license pursuant to this Act, in an amount 11    not to exceed $20,000 for each offense as determined by 12    the State Commission. A civil penalty shall be assessed by 13    the State Commission after a hearing is held in accordance 14    with the provisions set forth in this Act regarding the 15    provision of a hearing for the revocation or suspension of 16    a license. 17        (6) To hear and determine appeals from orders of a 18    local commission in accordance with the provisions of this 19    Act, as hereinafter set forth. Hearings under this 20    subsection shall be held in Springfield or Chicago, at 21    whichever location is the more convenient for the majority 22    of persons who are parties to the hearing. 23        (7) The State Commission shall establish uniform 24    systems of accounts to be kept by all retail licensees 25    having more than 4 employees, and for this purpose the 26    State Commission may classify all retail licensees having   HB3172- 8 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    more than 4 employees and establish a uniform system of 2    accounts for each class and prescribe the manner in which 3    such accounts shall be kept. The State Commission may also 4    prescribe the forms of accounts to be kept by all retail 5    licensees having more than 4 employees, including, but not 6    limited to, accounts of earnings and expenses and any 7    distribution, payment, or other distribution of earnings 8    or assets, and any other forms, records, and memoranda 9    which in the judgment of the commission may be necessary 10    or appropriate to carry out any of the provisions of this 11    Act, including, but not limited to, such forms, records, 12    and memoranda as will readily and accurately disclose at 13    all times the beneficial ownership of such retail licensed 14    business. The accounts, forms, records, and memoranda 15    shall be available at all reasonable times for inspection 16    by authorized representatives of the State Commission or 17    by any local liquor control commissioner or his or her 18    authorized representative. The commission may, from time 19    to time, alter, amend, or repeal, in whole or in part, any 20    uniform system of accounts, or the form and manner of 21    keeping accounts. 22        (8) In the conduct of any hearing authorized to be 23    held by the State Commission, to appoint, at the 24    commission's discretion, hearing officers to conduct 25    hearings involving complex issues or issues that will 26    require a protracted period of time to resolve, to   HB3172- 9 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    examine, or cause to be examined, under oath, any 2    licensee, and to examine or cause to be examined the books 3    and records of such licensee; to hear testimony and take 4    proof material for its information in the discharge of its 5    duties hereunder; to administer or cause to be 6    administered oaths; for any such purpose to issue subpoena 7    or subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses and 8    the production of books, which shall be effective in any 9    part of this State, and to adopt rules to implement its 10    powers under this paragraph (8). 11        Any circuit court may, by order duly entered, require 12    the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant 13    books subpoenaed by the State Commission and the court may 14    compel obedience to its order by proceedings for contempt. 15        (9) To investigate the administration of laws in 16    relation to alcoholic liquors in this and other states and 17    any foreign countries, and to recommend from time to time 18    to the Governor and through him or her to the legislature 19    of this State, such amendments to this Act, if any, as it 20    may think desirable and as will serve to further the 21    general broad purposes contained in Section 1-2 hereof. 22        (10) To adopt such rules and regulations consistent 23    with the provisions of this Act which shall be necessary 24    for the control, sale, or disposition of alcoholic liquor 25    damaged as a result of an accident, wreck, flood, fire, or 26    other similar occurrence.   HB3172- 10 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1        (11) To develop industry educational programs related 2    to responsible serving and selling, particularly in the 3    areas of overserving consumers and illegal underage 4    purchasing and consumption of alcoholic beverages. 5        (11.1) To license persons providing education and 6    training to alcohol beverage sellers and servers for 7    mandatory and non-mandatory training under the Beverage 8    Alcohol Sellers and Servers Education and Training 9    (BASSET) programs and to develop and administer a public 10    awareness program in Illinois to reduce or eliminate the 11    illegal purchase and consumption of alcoholic beverage 12    products by persons under the age of 21. Application for a 13    license shall be made on forms provided by the State 14    Commission. 15        (12) To develop and maintain a repository of license 16    and regulatory information. 17        (13) (Blank).18        (14) On or before April 30, 2008 and every 2 years 19    thereafter, the State Commission shall present a written 20    report to the Governor and the General Assembly that shall 21    be based on a study of the impact of Public Act 95-634 on 22    the business of soliciting, selling, and shipping wine 23    from inside and outside of this State directly to 24    residents of this State. As part of its report, the State 25    Commission shall provide all of the following information:26            (A) The amount of State excise and sales tax   HB3172- 11 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1        revenues generated.2            (B) The amount of licensing fees received.3            (C) The number of cases of wine shipped from 4        inside and outside of this State directly to residents 5        of this State.6            (D) The number of alcohol compliance operations 7        conducted.8            (E) The number of winery shipper's licenses 9        issued.10            (F) The number of each of the following: reported 11        violations; cease and desist notices issued by the 12        Commission; notices of violations issued by the 13        Commission and to the Department of Revenue; and 14        notices and complaints of violations to law 15        enforcement officials, including, without limitation, 16        the Illinois Attorney General and the U.S. Department 17        of Treasury's Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade 18        Bureau.19        (15) As a means to reduce the underage consumption of 20    alcoholic liquors, the State Commission shall conduct 21    alcohol compliance operations to investigate whether 22    businesses that are soliciting, selling, and shipping wine 23    from inside or outside of this State directly to residents 24    of this State are licensed by this State or are selling or 25    attempting to sell wine to persons under 21 years of age in 26    violation of this Act.  HB3172- 12 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1        (16) The State Commission shall, in addition to 2    notifying any appropriate law enforcement agency, submit 3    notices of complaints or violations of Sections 6-29 and 4    6-29.1 by persons who do not hold a winery shipper's 5    license under this Act to the Illinois Attorney General 6    and to the U.S. Department of Treasury's Alcohol and 7    Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau.8        (17)(A) A person licensed to make wine under the laws 9    of another state who has a winery shipper's license under 10    this Act and annually produces less than 25,000 gallons of 11    wine or a person who has a first-class or second-class 12    wine manufacturer's license, a first-class or second-class 13    wine-maker's license, or a limited wine manufacturer's 14    license under this Act and annually produces less than 15    25,000 gallons of wine may make application to the 16    Commission for a self-distribution exemption to allow the 17    sale of not more than 5,000 gallons of the exemption 18    holder's wine to retail licensees per year and to sell 19    cider, mead, or both cider and mead to brewers, class 1 20    brewers, class 2 brewers, and class 3 brewers that, 21    pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, 22    sell beer, cider, mead, or any combination thereof to 23    non-licensees at their breweries.24        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 25    penalty of perjury, such person shall state (1) the date 26    it was established; (2) its volume of production and sales   HB3172- 13 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    for each year since its establishment; (3) its efforts to 2    establish distributor relationships; (4) that a 3    self-distribution exemption is necessary to facilitate the 4    marketing of its wine; and (5) that it will comply with the 5    liquor and revenue laws of the United States, this State, 6    and any other state where it is licensed.7        (C) The State Commission shall approve the application 8    for a self-distribution exemption if such person: (1) is 9    in compliance with State revenue and liquor laws; (2) is 10    not a member of any affiliated group that produces 11    directly or indirectly more than 25,000 gallons of wine 12    per annum, 930,000 gallons of beer per annum, or 50,000 13    gallons of spirits per annum; (3) will not annually 14    produce for sale more than 25,000 gallons of wine, 930,000 15    gallons of beer, or 50,000 gallons of spirits; and (4) 16    will not annually sell more than 5,000 gallons of its wine 17    to retail licensees.18        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 19    annually certify to the State Commission its production of 20    wine in the previous 12 months and its anticipated 21    production and sales for the next 12 months. The State 22    Commission may fine, suspend, or revoke a 23    self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it finds 24    that the exemption holder has made a material 25    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 26    or liquor law of Illinois, exceeded production of 25,000   HB3172- 14 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    gallons of wine, 930,000 gallons of beer, or 50,000 2    gallons of spirits in any calendar year, or become part of 3    an affiliated group producing more than 25,000 gallons of 4    wine, 930,000 gallons of beer, or 50,000 gallons of 5    spirits.6        (E) Except in hearings for violations of this Act or 7    Public Act 95-634 or a bona fide investigation by duly 8    sworn law enforcement officials, the State Commission, or 9    its agents, the State Commission shall maintain the 10    production and sales information of a self-distribution 11    exemption holder as confidential and shall not release 12    such information to any person.13        (F) The State Commission shall issue regulations 14    governing self-distribution exemptions consistent with 15    this Section and this Act.16        (G) Nothing in this paragraph (17) shall prohibit a 17    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 18    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 19    licensed Illinois distributor.20        (H) It is the intent of this paragraph (17) to promote 21    and continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds 22    that, in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory 23    distribution system, it is necessary to create an 24    exception for smaller makers of wine as their wines are 25    frequently adjusted in varietals, mixes, vintages, and 26    taste to find and create market niches sometimes too small   HB3172- 15 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    for distributor or importing distributor business 2    strategies. Limited self-distribution rights will afford 3    and allow smaller makers of wine access to the marketplace 4    in order to develop a customer base without impairing the 5    integrity of the 3-tier system. 6        (17.5)(A) A person who has a third-class wine-maker's 7    license and annually produces less than 250,000 gallons of 8    wine may make application to the Commission for a 9    self-distribution exemption to allow the sale of not more 10    than 25,000 gallons of the exemption holder's wine to 11    retail licensees per year and to sell cider, mead, or both 12    cider and mead to brewers, class 1 brewers, class 2 13    brewers, and class 3 brewers that, pursuant to subsection 14    (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer, cider, mead, or 15    any combination thereof to non-licensees at their 16    breweries.17        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 18    penalty of perjury, such person shall state (1) the date 19    it was established; (2) its volume of production and sales 20    for each year since its establishment; (3) its efforts to 21    establish distributor relationships; (4) that a 22    self-distribution exemption is necessary to facilitate the 23    marketing of its wine; and (5) that it will comply with the 24    liquor and revenue laws of the United States, this State, 25    and any other state where it is licensed.26        (C) The State Commission shall approve the application   HB3172- 16 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    for a self-distribution exemption if such person: (1) is 2    in compliance with State revenue and liquor laws; (2) is 3    not a member of any affiliated group that produces 4    directly or indirectly more than 250,000 gallons of wine 5    per annum, 930,000 gallons of beer per annum, or 50,000 6    gallons of spirits per annum; (3) will not annually 7    produce for sale more than 250,000 gallons of wine, 8    930,000 gallons of beer, or 50,000 gallons of spirits; and 9    (4) will not annually sell more than 25,000 gallons of its 10    wine to retail licensees.11        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 12    annually certify to the State Commission its production of 13    wine in the previous 12 months and its anticipated 14    production and sales for the next 12 months. The State 15    Commission may fine, suspend, or revoke a 16    self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it finds 17    that the exemption holder has made a material 18    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 19    or liquor law of Illinois, exceeded production of 250,000 20    gallons of wine, 930,000 gallons of beer, or 50,000 21    gallons of spirits in any calendar year, or become part of 22    an affiliated group producing more than 250,000 gallons of 23    wine, 930,000 gallons of beer, or 50,000 gallons of 24    spirits.25        (E) Except in hearings for violations of this Act or 26    Public Act 95-634 or a bona fide investigation by duly   HB3172- 17 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    sworn law enforcement officials, the State Commission, or 2    its agents, the State Commission shall maintain the 3    production and sales information of a self-distribution 4    exemption holder as confidential and shall not release 5    such information to any person.6        (F) The State Commission shall issue regulations 7    governing self-distribution exemptions consistent with 8    this Section and this Act.9        (G) Nothing in this paragraph (17.5) shall prohibit a 10    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 11    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 12    licensed Illinois distributor.13        (H) It is the intent of this paragraph (17.5) to 14    promote and continue orderly markets. The General Assembly 15    finds that, in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory 16    distribution system, it is necessary to create an 17    exception for smaller makers of wine as their wines are 18    frequently adjusted in varietals, mixes, vintages, and 19    taste to find and create market niches sometimes too small 20    for distributor or importing distributor business 21    strategies. Limited self-distribution rights will afford 22    and allow smaller makers of wine access to the marketplace 23    in order to develop a customer base without impairing the 24    integrity of the 3-tier system. 25        (18)(A) A class 1 brewer licensee, who must also be 26    either a licensed brewer or licensed non-resident dealer   HB3172- 18 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    and annually manufacture less than 930,000 gallons of 2    beer, may make application to the State Commission for a 3    self-distribution exemption to allow the sale of not more 4    than 232,500 gallons per year of the exemption holder's 5    beer to retail licensees and to brewers, class 1 brewers, 6    and class 2 brewers that, pursuant to subsection (e) of 7    Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer, cider, mead, or any 8    combination thereof to non-licensees at their breweries.9        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 10    penalty of perjury, the class 1 brewer licensee shall 11    state (1) the date it was established; (2) its volume of 12    beer manufactured and sold for each year since its 13    establishment; (3) its efforts to establish distributor 14    relationships; (4) that a self-distribution exemption is 15    necessary to facilitate the marketing of its beer; and (5) 16    that it will comply with the alcoholic beverage and 17    revenue laws of the United States, this State, and any 18    other state where it is licensed.19        (C) Any application submitted shall be posted on the 20    State Commission's website at least 45 days prior to 21    action by the State Commission. The State Commission shall 22    approve the application for a self-distribution exemption 23    if the class 1 brewer licensee: (1) is in compliance with 24    the State, revenue, and alcoholic beverage laws; (2) is 25    not a member of any affiliated group that manufactures, 26    directly or indirectly, more than 930,000 gallons of beer   HB3172- 19 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    per annum, 25,000 gallons of wine per annum, or 50,000 2    gallons of spirits per annum; (3) shall not annually 3    manufacture for sale more than 930,000 gallons of beer, 4    25,000 gallons of wine, or 50,000 gallons of spirits; (4) 5    shall not annually sell more than 232,500 gallons of its 6    beer to retail licensees and class 3 brewers and to 7    brewers, class 1 brewers, and class 2 brewers that, 8    pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, 9    sell beer, cider, mead, or any combination thereof to 10    non-licensees at their breweries; and (5) has relinquished 11    any brew pub license held by the licensee, including any 12    ownership interest it held in the licensed brew pub.13        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 14    annually certify to the State Commission its manufacture 15    of beer during the previous 12 months and its anticipated 16    manufacture and sales of beer for the next 12 months. The 17    State Commission may fine, suspend, or revoke a 18    self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it finds 19    that the exemption holder has made a material 20    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 21    or alcoholic beverage law of Illinois, exceeded the 22    manufacture of 930,000 gallons of beer, 25,000 gallons of 23    wine, or 50,000 gallons of spirits in any calendar year or 24    became part of an affiliated group manufacturing more than 25    930,000 gallons of beer, 25,000 gallons of wine, or 50,000 26    gallons of spirits.  HB3172- 20 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1        (E) The State Commission shall issue rules and 2    regulations governing self-distribution exemptions 3    consistent with this Act.4        (F) Nothing in this paragraph (18) shall prohibit a 5    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 6    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 7    licensed Illinois importing distributor or a distributor. 8    If a self-distribution exemption holder enters into a 9    distribution agreement and has assigned distribution 10    rights to an importing distributor or distributor, then 11    the self-distribution exemption holder's distribution 12    rights in the assigned territories shall cease in a 13    reasonable time not to exceed 60 days.14        (G) It is the intent of this paragraph (18) to promote 15    and continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds 16    that in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory 17    distribution system, it is necessary to create an 18    exception for smaller manufacturers in order to afford and 19    allow such smaller manufacturers of beer access to the 20    marketplace in order to develop a customer base without 21    impairing the integrity of the 3-tier system. 22        (19)(A) A class 1 craft distiller licensee or a 23    non-resident dealer who manufactures less than 50,000 24    gallons of distilled spirits per year may make application 25    to the State Commission for a self-distribution exemption 26    to allow the sale of not more than 5,000 gallons of the   HB3172- 21 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    exemption holder's spirits to retail licensees per year. 2        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 3    penalty of perjury, the class 1 craft distiller licensee 4    or non-resident dealer shall state (1) the date it was 5    established; (2) its volume of spirits manufactured and 6    sold for each year since its establishment; (3) its 7    efforts to establish distributor relationships; (4) that a 8    self-distribution exemption is necessary to facilitate the 9    marketing of its spirits; and (5) that it will comply with 10    the alcoholic beverage and revenue laws of the United 11    States, this State, and any other state where it is 12    licensed. 13        (C) Any application submitted shall be posted on the 14    State Commission's website at least 45 days prior to 15    action by the State Commission. The State Commission shall 16    approve the application for a self-distribution exemption 17    if the applicant: (1) is in compliance with State revenue 18    and alcoholic beverage laws; (2) is not a member of any 19    affiliated group that produces more than 50,000 gallons of 20    spirits per annum, 930,000 gallons of beer per annum, or 21    25,000 gallons of wine per annum; (3) does not annually 22    manufacture for sale more than 50,000 gallons of spirits, 23    930,000 gallons of beer, or 25,000 gallons of wine; and 24    (4) does not annually sell more than 5,000 gallons of its 25    spirits to retail licensees. 26        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall   HB3172- 22 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    annually certify to the State Commission its manufacture 2    of spirits during the previous 12 months and its 3    anticipated manufacture and sales of spirits for the next 4    12 months. The State Commission may fine, suspend, or 5    revoke a self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it 6    finds that the exemption holder has made a material 7    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 8    or alcoholic beverage law of Illinois, exceeded the 9    manufacture of 50,000 gallons of spirits, 930,000 gallons 10    of beer, or 25,000 gallons of wine in any calendar year, or 11    has become part of an affiliated group manufacturing more 12    than 50,000 gallons of spirits, 930,000 gallons of beer, 13    or 25,000 gallons of wine. 14        (E) The State Commission shall adopt rules governing 15    self-distribution exemptions consistent with this Act. 16        (F) Nothing in this paragraph (19) shall prohibit a 17    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 18    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 19    licensed Illinois importing distributor or a distributor. 20        (G) It is the intent of this paragraph (19) to promote 21    and continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds 22    that in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory 23    distribution system, it is necessary to create an 24    exception for smaller manufacturers in order to afford and 25    allow such smaller manufacturers of spirits access to the 26    marketplace in order to develop a customer base without   HB3172- 23 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    impairing the integrity of the 3-tier system. 2        (20)(A) A class 3 brewer licensee who must manufacture 3    less than 465,000 gallons of beer in the aggregate and not 4    more than 155,000 gallons at any single brewery premises 5    may make application to the State Commission for a 6    self-distribution exemption to allow the sale of not more 7    than 6,200 gallons of beer from each in-state or 8    out-of-state class 3 brewery premises, which shall not 9    exceed 18,600 gallons annually in the aggregate, that is 10    manufactured at a wholly owned class 3 brewer's in-state 11    or out-of-state licensed premises to retail licensees and 12    class 3 brewers and to brewers, class 1 brewers, class 2 13    brewers that, pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 6-4, 14    sell beer, cider, or both beer and cider to non-licensees 15    at their licensed breweries.16        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 17    penalty of perjury, the class 3 brewer licensee shall 18    state:19            (1) the date it was established;20            (2) its volume of beer manufactured and sold for 21        each year since its establishment;22            (3) its efforts to establish distributor 23        relationships;24            (4) that a self-distribution exemption is 25        necessary to facilitate the marketing of its beer; and26            (5) that it will comply with the alcoholic   HB3172- 24 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1        beverage and revenue laws of the United States, this 2        State, and any other state where it is licensed.3        (C) Any application submitted shall be posted on the 4    State Commission's website at least 45 days before action 5    by the State Commission. The State Commission shall 6    approve the application for a self-distribution exemption 7    if the class 3 brewer licensee: (1) is in compliance with 8    the State, revenue, and alcoholic beverage laws; (2) is 9    not a member of any affiliated group that manufacturers, 10    directly or indirectly, more than 465,000 gallons of beer 11    per annum; (3) shall not annually manufacture for sale 12    more than 465,000 gallons of beer or more than 155,000 13    gallons at any single brewery premises; and (4) shall not 14    annually sell more than 6,200 gallons of beer from each 15    in-state or out-of-state class 3 brewery premises, and 16    shall not exceed 18,600 gallons annually in the aggregate, 17    to retail licensees and class 3 brewers and to brewers, 18    class 1 brewers, and class 2 brewers that, pursuant to 19    subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer, 20    cider, or both beer and cider to non-licensees at their 21    breweries.22        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 23    annually certify to the State Commission its manufacture 24    of beer during the previous 12 months and its anticipated 25    manufacture and sales of beer for the next 12 months. The 26    State Commission may fine, suspend, or revoke a   HB3172- 25 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it finds 2    that the exemption holder has made a material 3    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 4    or alcoholic beverage law of Illinois, exceeded the 5    manufacture of 465,000 gallons of beer in any calendar 6    year or became part of an affiliated group manufacturing 7    more than 465,000 gallons of beer, or exceeded the sale to 8    retail licensees, brewers, class 1 brewers, class 2 9    brewers, and class 3 brewers of 6,200 gallons per brewery 10    location or 18,600 gallons in the aggregate.11        (E) The State Commission may adopt rules governing 12    self-distribution exemptions consistent with this Act.13        (F) Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a 14    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 15    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 16    licensed Illinois importing distributor or a distributor. 17    If a self-distribution exemption holder enters into a 18    distribution agreement and has assigned distribution 19    rights to an importing distributor or distributor, then 20    the self-distribution exemption holder's distribution 21    rights in the assigned territories shall cease in a 22    reasonable time not to exceed 60 days.23        (G) It is the intent of this paragraph to promote and 24    continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds that 25    in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory distribution 26    system, it is necessary to create an exception for smaller   HB3172- 26 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    manufacturers in order to afford and allow such smaller 2    manufacturers of beer access to the marketplace in order 3    to develop a customer base without impairing the integrity 4    of the 3-tier system. 5    (b) On or before April 30, 1999, the Commission shall 6present a written report to the Governor and the General 7Assembly that shall be based on a study of the impact of Public 8Act 90-739 on the business of soliciting, selling, and 9shipping alcoholic liquor from outside of this State directly 10to residents of this State. 11    As part of its report, the Commission shall provide the 12following information: 13        (i) the amount of State excise and sales tax revenues 14    generated as a result of Public Act 90-739; 15        (ii) the amount of licensing fees received as a result 16    of Public Act 90-739; 17        (iii) the number of reported violations, the number of 18    cease and desist notices issued by the Commission, the 19    number of notices of violations issued to the Department 20    of Revenue, and the number of notices and complaints of 21    violations to law enforcement officials. 22(Source: P.A. 101-37, eff. 7-3-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 23101-482, eff. 8-23-19; 102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 248-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 25    (235 ILCS 5/5-1)  (from Ch. 43, par. 115)  HB3172- 27 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    Sec. 5-1. Licenses issued by the Illinois Liquor Control 2Commission shall be of the following classes:3    (a) Manufacturer's license - Class 1. Distiller, Class 2. 4Rectifier, Class 3. Brewer, Class 4. First Class Wine 5Manufacturer, Class 5. Second Class Wine Manufacturer, Class 66. First Class Winemaker, Class 7. Second Class Winemaker, 7Class 8. Limited Wine Manufacturer, Class 9. Craft Distiller, 8Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller, Class 11. Class 2 Craft 9Distiller, Class 12. Class 1 Brewer, Class 13. Class 2 Brewer, 10Class 14. Class 3 Brewer, Class 15. Third-Class Wine-Maker, 11    (b) Distributor's license,12    (c) Importing Distributor's license,13    (d) Retailer's license,14    (e) Special Event Retailer's license (not-for-profit),15    (f) Railroad license,16    (g) Boat license,17    (h) Non-Beverage User's license,18    (i) Wine-maker's premises license,19    (j) Airplane license,20    (k) Foreign importer's license,21    (l) Broker's license,22    (m) Non-resident dealer's license,23    (n) Brew Pub license,24    (o) Auction liquor license,25    (p) Caterer retailer license,26    (q) Special use permit license,  HB3172- 28 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    (r) Winery shipper's license,2    (s) Craft distiller tasting permit,3    (t) Brewer warehouse permit, 4    (u) Distilling pub license, 5    (v) Craft distiller warehouse permit,6    (w) Beer showcase permit. 7    No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other legal 8business entity that is engaged in the manufacturing of wine 9may concurrently obtain and hold a wine-maker's license and a 10wine manufacturer's license.11    (a) A manufacturer's license shall allow the manufacture, 12importation in bulk, storage, distribution and sale of 13alcoholic liquor to persons without the State, as may be 14permitted by law and to licensees in this State as follows:15    Class 1. A Distiller may make sales and deliveries of 16alcoholic liquor to distillers, rectifiers, importing 17distributors, distributors and non-beverage users and to no 18other licensees.19    Class 2. A Rectifier, who is not a distiller, as defined 20herein, may make sales and deliveries of alcoholic liquor to 21rectifiers, importing distributors, distributors, retailers 22and non-beverage users and to no other licensees.23    Class 3. A Brewer may make sales and deliveries of beer to 24importing distributors and distributors and may make sales as 25authorized under subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, 26including any alcoholic liquor that subsection (e) of Section   HB3172- 29 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b16-4 authorizes a brewer to sell in its original package only to 2a non-licensee for pick-up by a non-licensee either within the 3interior of the brewery premises or at outside of the brewery 4premises at a curb-side or parking lot adjacent to the brewery 5premises, subject to any local ordinance.6    Class 4. A first class wine-manufacturer may make sales 7and deliveries of up to 50,000 gallons of wine to 8manufacturers, importing distributors and distributors, and to 9no other licensees. If a first-class wine-manufacturer 10manufactures beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be 11eligible for, in addition to any current license, a class 1 12brewer license, shall not manufacture more than 930,000 13gallons of beer per year, and shall not be a member of or 14affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 15produces more than 930,000 gallons of beer per year. If the 16first-class wine-manufacturer manufactures spirits, it shall 17also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 18current license, a class 1 craft distiller license, shall not 19manufacture more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year, and 20shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 21indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 50,000 22gallons of spirits per year. A first-class wine-manufacturer 23shall be permitted to sell wine manufactured at the 24first-class wine-manufacturer premises to non-licensees. 25    Class 5. A second class Wine manufacturer may make sales 26and deliveries of more than 50,000 gallons of wine to   HB3172- 30 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1manufacturers, importing distributors and distributors and to 2no other licensees.3    Class 6. A first-class wine-maker's license shall allow 4the manufacture of up to 50,000 gallons of wine per year, and 5the storage and sale of such wine to distributors in the State 6and to persons without the State, as may be permitted by law. A 7person who, prior to June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public 8Act 95-634), is a holder of a first-class wine-maker's license 9and annually produces more than 25,000 gallons of its own wine 10and who distributes its wine to licensed retailers shall cease 11this practice on or before July 1, 2008 in compliance with 12Public Act 95-634. If a first-class wine-maker manufactures 13beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in 14addition to any current license, a class 1 brewer license, 15shall not manufacture more than 930,000 gallons of beer per 16year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly 17or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 18gallons of beer per year. If the first-class wine-maker 19manufactures spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be 20eligible for, in addition to any current license, a class 1 21craft distiller license, shall not manufacture more than 2250,000 gallons of spirits per year, and shall not be a member 23of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 24that produces more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. A 25first-class wine-maker holding a class 1 brewer license or a 26class 1 craft distiller license shall not be eligible for a   HB3172- 31 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1wine-maker's premises license but shall be permitted to sell 2wine manufactured at the first-class wine-maker premises to 3non-licensees. 4    Class 7. A second-class wine-maker's license shall allow 5the manufacture of up to 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and 6the storage and sale of such wine to distributors in this State 7and to persons without the State, as may be permitted by law. A 8person who, prior to June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public 9Act 95-634), is a holder of a second-class wine-maker's 10license and annually produces more than 25,000 gallons of its 11own wine and who distributes its wine to licensed retailers 12shall cease this practice on or before July 1, 2008 in 13compliance with Public Act 95-634. If a second-class 14wine-maker manufactures beer, it shall also obtain and shall 15only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 16class 2 brewer license, shall not manufacture more than 173,720,000 gallons of beer per year, and shall not be a member 18of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 19that produces more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year. If 20a second-class wine-maker manufactures spirits, it shall also 21obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 22current license, a class 2 craft distiller license, shall not 23manufacture more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per year, and 24shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 25indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 26gallons of spirits per year.   HB3172- 32 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    Class 8. A limited wine-manufacturer may make sales and 2deliveries not to exceed 40,000 gallons of wine per year to 3distributors, and to non-licensees in accordance with the 4provisions of this Act.5    Class 9. A craft distiller license, which may only be held 6by a class 1 craft distiller licensee or class 2 craft 7distiller licensee but not held by both a class 1 craft 8distiller licensee and a class 2 craft distiller licensee, 9shall grant all rights conveyed by either: (i) a class 1 craft 10distiller license if the craft distiller holds a class 1 craft 11distiller license; or (ii) a class 2 craft distiller licensee 12if the craft distiller holds a class 2 craft distiller 13license. 14    Class 10. A class 1 craft distiller license, which may 15only be issued to a licensed craft distiller or licensed 16non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture of up to 1750,000 gallons of spirits per year provided that the class 1 18craft distiller licensee does not manufacture more than a 19combined 50,000 gallons of spirits per year and is not a member 20of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 21that produces more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. If 22a class 1 craft distiller manufactures beer, it shall also 23obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 24current license, a class 1 brewer license, shall not 25manufacture more than 930,000 gallons of beer per year, and 26shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or   HB3172- 33 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 2gallons of beer per year. If a class 1 craft distiller 3manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall only be 4eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 5first-class wine-manufacturer license or a first-class 6wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 7gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a member of or 8affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 9produces more than 50,000 gallons of wine per year. A class 1 10craft distiller licensee may make sales and deliveries to 11importing distributors and distributors and to retail 12licensees in accordance with the conditions set forth in 13paragraph (19) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12 of this Act. 14However, the aggregate amount of spirits sold to non-licensees 15and sold or delivered to retail licensees may not exceed 5,000 16gallons per year.17    A class 1 craft distiller licensee may sell up to 5,000 18gallons of such spirits to non-licensees to the extent 19permitted by any exemption approved by the State Commission 20pursuant to Section 6-4 of this Act. A class 1 craft distiller 21license holder may store such spirits at a non-contiguous 22licensed location, but at no time shall a class 1 craft 23distiller license holder directly or indirectly produce in the 24aggregate more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. 25    A class 1 craft distiller licensee may hold more than one 26class 1 craft distiller's license. However, a class 1 craft   HB3172- 34 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1distiller that holds more than one class 1 craft distiller 2license shall not manufacture, in the aggregate, more than 350,000 gallons of spirits by distillation per year and shall 4not sell, in the aggregate, more than 5,000 gallons of such 5spirits to non-licensees in accordance with an exemption 6approved by the State Commission pursuant to Section 6-4 of 7this Act. 8    Class 11. A class 2 craft distiller license, which may 9only be issued to a licensed craft distiller or licensed 10non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture of up to 11100,000 gallons of spirits per year provided that the class 2 12craft distiller licensee does not manufacture more than a 13combined 100,000 gallons of spirits per year and is not a 14member of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a 15manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 gallons of 16spirits per year. If a class 2 craft distiller manufactures 17beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in 18addition to any current license, a class 2 brewer license, 19shall not manufacture more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per 20year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly 21or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 223,720,000 gallons of beer per year. If a class 2 craft 23distiller manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall 24only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 25second-class wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more 26than 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a   HB3172- 35 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1member of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a 2manufacturer that produces more than 150,000 gallons of wine 3per year. A class 2 craft distiller licensee may make sales and 4deliveries to importing distributors and distributors, but 5shall not make sales or deliveries to any other licensee. If 6the State Commission provides prior approval, a class 2 craft 7distiller licensee may annually transfer up to 100,000 gallons 8of spirits manufactured by that class 2 craft distiller 9licensee to the premises of a licensed class 2 craft distiller 10wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. A class 2 craft 11distiller may transfer spirits to a distilling pub wholly 12owned and operated by the class 2 craft distiller subject to 13the following limitations and restrictions: (i) the transfer 14shall not annually exceed more than 5,000 gallons; (ii) the 15annual amount transferred shall reduce the distilling pub's 16annual permitted production limit; (iii) all spirits 17transferred shall be subject to Article VIII of this Act; (iv) 18a written record shall be maintained by the distiller and 19distilling pub specifying the amount, date of delivery, and 20receipt of the product by the distilling pub; and (v) the 21distilling pub shall be located no farther than 80 miles from 22the class 2 craft distiller's licensed location. 23    A class 2 craft distiller shall, prior to transferring 24spirits to a distilling pub wholly owned by the class 2 craft 25distiller, furnish a written notice to the State Commission of 26intent to transfer spirits setting forth the name and address   HB3172- 36 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1of the distilling pub and shall annually submit to the State 2Commission a verified report identifying the total gallons of 3spirits transferred to the distilling pub wholly owned by the 4class 2 craft distiller. 5    A class 2 craft distiller license holder may store such 6spirits at a non-contiguous licensed location, but at no time 7shall a class 2 craft distiller license holder directly or 8indirectly produce in the aggregate more than 100,000 gallons 9of spirits per year. 10    Class 12. A class 1 brewer license, which may only be 11issued to a licensed brewer or licensed non-resident dealer, 12shall allow the manufacture of up to 930,000 gallons of beer 13per year provided that the class 1 brewer licensee does not 14manufacture more than a combined 930,000 gallons of beer per 15year and is not a member of or affiliated with, directly or 16indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 17gallons of beer per year. If a class 1 brewer manufactures 18spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, 19in addition to any current license, a class 1 craft distiller 20license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 gallons of 21spirits per year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated 22with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces 23more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. If a class 1 24craft brewer manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall 25only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 26first-class wine-manufacturer license or a first-class   HB3172- 37 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 2gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a member of or 3affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 4produces more than 50,000 gallons of wine per year. A class 1 5brewer licensee may make sales and deliveries to importing 6distributors and distributors and to retail licensees in 7accordance with the conditions set forth in paragraph (18) of 8subsection (a) of Section 3-12 of this Act. If the State 9Commission provides prior approval, a class 1 brewer may 10annually transfer up to 930,000 gallons of beer manufactured 11by that class 1 brewer to the premises of a licensed class 1 12brewer wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. 13    Class 13. A class 2 brewer license, which may only be 14issued to a licensed brewer or licensed non-resident dealer, 15shall allow the manufacture of up to 3,720,000 gallons of beer 16per year provided that the class 2 brewer licensee does not 17manufacture more than a combined 3,720,000 gallons of beer per 18year and is not a member of or affiliated with, directly or 19indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 3,720,000 20gallons of beer per year. If a class 2 brewer manufactures 21spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, 22in addition to any current license, a class 2 craft distiller 23license, shall not manufacture more than 100,000 gallons of 24spirits per year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated 25with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces 26more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per year. If a class 2   HB3172- 38 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1craft distiller manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and 2shall only be eligible for, in addition to any current 3license, a second-class wine-maker's license, shall not 4manufacture more than 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and 5shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 6indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 150,000 7gallons of wine a year. A class 2 brewer licensee may make 8sales and deliveries to importing distributors and 9distributors, but shall not make sales or deliveries to any 10other licensee. If the State Commission provides prior 11approval, a class 2 brewer licensee may annually transfer up 12to 3,720,000 gallons of beer manufactured by that class 2 13brewer licensee to the premises of a licensed class 2 brewer 14wholly owned and operated by the same licensee.15    A class 2 brewer may transfer beer to a brew pub wholly 16owned and operated by the class 2 brewer subject to the 17following limitations and restrictions: (i) the transfer shall 18not annually exceed more than 31,000 gallons; (ii) the annual 19amount transferred shall reduce the brew pub's annual 20permitted production limit; (iii) all beer transferred shall 21be subject to Article VIII of this Act; (iv) a written record 22shall be maintained by the brewer and brew pub specifying the 23amount, date of delivery, and receipt of the product by the 24brew pub; and (v) the brew pub shall be located no farther than 2580 miles from the class 2 brewer's licensed location. 26    A class 2 brewer shall, prior to transferring beer to a   HB3172- 39 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1brew pub wholly owned by the class 2 brewer, furnish a written 2notice to the State Commission of intent to transfer beer 3setting forth the name and address of the brew pub and shall 4annually submit to the State Commission a verified report 5identifying the total gallons of beer transferred to the brew 6pub wholly owned by the class 2 brewer. 7    Class 14. A class 3 brewer license, which may be issued to 8a brewer or a non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture 9of no more than 465,000 gallons of beer per year and no more 10than 155,000 gallons at a single brewery premises, and shall 11allow the sale of no more than 6,200 gallons of beer from each 12in-state or out-of-state class 3 brewery premises, or 18,600 13gallons in the aggregate, to retail licensees, class 1 14brewers, class 2 brewers, and class 3 brewers as long as the 15class 3 brewer licensee does not manufacture more than a 16combined 465,000 gallons of beer per year and is not a member 17of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 18that produces more than 465,000 gallons of beer per year to 19make sales to importing distributors, distributors, retail 20licensees, brewers, class 1 brewers, class 2 brewers, and 21class 3 brewers in accordance with the conditions set forth in 22paragraph (20) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12. If the State 23Commission provides prior approval, a class 3 brewer may 24annually transfer up to 155,000 gallons of beer manufactured 25by that class 3 brewer to the premises of a licensed class 3 26brewer wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. A class   HB3172- 40 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b13 brewer shall manufacture beer at the brewer's class 3 2designated licensed premises, and may sell beer as otherwise 3provided in this Act. 4    Class 15. A third-class wine-maker's license shall allow 5the manufacture of up to 250,000 gallons of wine per year and 6the storage and sale of such wine to distributors in this State 7and to persons without the State, as may be permitted by law. 8    (a-1) A manufacturer which is licensed in this State to 9make sales or deliveries of alcoholic liquor to licensed 10distributors or importing distributors and which enlists 11agents, representatives, or individuals acting on its behalf 12who contact licensed retailers on a regular and continual 13basis in this State must register those agents, 14representatives, or persons acting on its behalf with the 15State Commission.16    Registration of agents, representatives, or persons acting 17on behalf of a manufacturer is fulfilled by submitting a form 18to the Commission. The form shall be developed by the 19Commission and shall include the name and address of the 20applicant, the name and address of the manufacturer he or she 21represents, the territory or areas assigned to sell to or 22discuss pricing terms of alcoholic liquor, and any other 23questions deemed appropriate and necessary. All statements in 24the forms required to be made by law or by rule shall be deemed 25material, and any person who knowingly misstates any material 26fact under oath in an application is guilty of a Class B   HB3172- 41 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1misdemeanor. Fraud, misrepresentation, false statements, 2misleading statements, evasions, or suppression of material 3facts in the securing of a registration are grounds for 4suspension or revocation of the registration. The State 5Commission shall post a list of registered agents on the 6Commission's website.7    (b) A distributor's license shall allow (i) the wholesale 8purchase and storage of alcoholic liquors and sale of 9alcoholic liquors to licensees in this State and to persons 10without the State, as may be permitted by law; (ii) the sale of 11beer, cider, mead, or any combination thereof to brewers, 12class 1 brewers, and class 2 brewers that, pursuant to 13subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer, cider, 14mead, or any combination thereof to non-licensees at their 15breweries; (iii) the sale of vermouth to class 1 craft 16distillers and class 2 craft distillers that, pursuant to 17subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell spirits, 18vermouth, or both spirits and vermouth to non-licensees at 19their distilleries; or (iv) as otherwise provided in this Act. 20No person licensed as a distributor shall be granted a 21non-resident dealer's license.22    (c) An importing distributor's license may be issued to 23and held by those only who are duly licensed distributors, 24upon the filing of an application by a duly licensed 25distributor, with the Commission and the Commission shall, 26without the payment of any fee, immediately issue such   HB3172- 42 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1importing distributor's license to the applicant, which shall 2allow the importation of alcoholic liquor by the licensee into 3this State from any point in the United States outside this 4State, and the purchase of alcoholic liquor in barrels, casks 5or other bulk containers and the bottling of such alcoholic 6liquors before resale thereof, but all bottles or containers 7so filled shall be sealed, labeled, stamped and otherwise made 8to comply with all provisions, rules and regulations governing 9manufacturers in the preparation and bottling of alcoholic 10liquors. The importing distributor's license shall permit such 11licensee to purchase alcoholic liquor from Illinois licensed 12non-resident dealers and foreign importers only. No person 13licensed as an importing distributor shall be granted a 14non-resident dealer's license.15    (d) A retailer's license shall allow the licensee to sell 16and offer for sale at retail, only in the premises specified in 17the license, alcoholic liquor for use or consumption, but not 18for resale in any form. Except as provided in Section 6-16, 196-29, or 6-29.1, nothing in this Act shall deny, limit, 20remove, or restrict the ability of a holder of a retailer's 21license to transfer or ship alcoholic liquor to the purchaser 22for use or consumption subject to any applicable local law or 23ordinance. For the purposes of this Section, "shipping" means 24the movement of alcoholic liquor from a licensed retailer to a 25consumer via a common carrier. Except as provided in Section 266-16, 6-29, or 6-29.1, nothing in this Act shall deny, limit,   HB3172- 43 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1remove, or restrict the ability of a holder of a retailer's 2license to deliver alcoholic liquor to the purchaser for use 3or consumption. The delivery shall be made only within 12 4hours from the time the alcoholic liquor leaves the licensed 5premises of the retailer for delivery. For the purposes of 6this Section, "delivery" means the movement of alcoholic 7liquor purchased from a licensed retailer to a consumer 8through the following methods:9        (1) delivery within licensed retailer's parking lot, 10    including curbside, for pickup by the consumer;11        (2) delivery by an owner, officer, director, 12    shareholder, or employee of the licensed retailer; or13        (3) delivery by a third-party contractor, independent 14    contractor, or agent with whom the licensed retailer has 15    contracted to make deliveries of alcoholic liquors. 16    Under subsection (1), (2), or (3), delivery shall not 17include the use of common carriers. 18    Any retail license issued to a manufacturer shall only 19permit the manufacturer to sell beer at retail on the premises 20actually occupied by the manufacturer. For the purpose of 21further describing the type of business conducted at a retail 22licensed premises, a retailer's licensee may be designated by 23the State Commission as (i) an on premise consumption 24retailer, (ii) an off premise sale retailer, or (iii) a 25combined on premise consumption and off premise sale retailer. 26    Except for a municipality with a population of more than   HB3172- 44 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b11,000,000 inhabitants, a home rule unit may not regulate the 2delivery of alcoholic liquor inconsistent with this 3subsection. This paragraph is a limitation under subsection 4(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on 5the concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and 6functions exercised by the State. A non-home rule municipality 7may not regulate the delivery of alcoholic liquor inconsistent 8with this subsection. 9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 10(d), a retail licensee may sell alcoholic liquors to a special 11event retailer licensee for resale to the extent permitted 12under subsection (e).13    (e) A special event retailer's license (not-for-profit) 14shall permit the licensee to purchase alcoholic liquors from 15an Illinois licensed distributor (unless the licensee 16purchases less than $500 of alcoholic liquors for the special 17event, in which case the licensee may purchase the alcoholic 18liquors from a licensed retailer) and shall allow the licensee 19to sell and offer for sale, at retail, alcoholic liquors for 20use or consumption, but not for resale in any form and only at 21the location and on the specific dates designated for the 22special event in the license. An applicant for a special event 23retailer license must (i) furnish with the application: (A) a 24resale number issued under Section 2c of the Retailers' 25Occupation Tax Act or evidence that the applicant is 26registered under Section 2a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax   HB3172- 45 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1Act, (B) a current, valid exemption identification number 2issued under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 3and a certification to the Commission that the purchase of 4alcoholic liquors will be a tax-exempt purchase, or (C) a 5statement that the applicant is not registered under Section 62a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, does not hold a resale 7number under Section 2c of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 8and does not hold an exemption number under Section 1g of the 9Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, in which event the Commission 10shall set forth on the special event retailer's license a 11statement to that effect; (ii) submit with the application 12proof satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant 13will provide dram shop liability insurance in the maximum 14limits; and (iii) show proof satisfactory to the State 15Commission that the applicant has obtained local authority 16approval.17    Nothing in this Act prohibits an Illinois licensed 18distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 19salable alcoholic liquors to a holder of a special event 20retailer's license or the special event retailer's licensee 21from accepting the credit or refund of alcoholic liquors at 22the conclusion of the event specified in the license.23    (f) A railroad license shall permit the licensee to import 24alcoholic liquors into this State from any point in the United 25States outside this State and to store such alcoholic liquors 26in this State; to make wholesale purchases of alcoholic   HB3172- 46 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1liquors directly from manufacturers, foreign importers, 2distributors and importing distributors from within or outside 3this State; and to store such alcoholic liquors in this State; 4provided that the above powers may be exercised only in 5connection with the importation, purchase or storage of 6alcoholic liquors to be sold or dispensed on a club, buffet, 7lounge or dining car operated on an electric, gas or steam 8railway in this State; and provided further, that railroad 9licensees exercising the above powers shall be subject to all 10provisions of Article VIII of this Act as applied to importing 11distributors. A railroad license shall also permit the 12licensee to sell or dispense alcoholic liquors on any club, 13buffet, lounge or dining car operated on an electric, gas or 14steam railway regularly operated by a common carrier in this 15State, but shall not permit the sale for resale of any 16alcoholic liquors to any licensee within this State. A license 17shall be obtained for each car in which such sales are made.18    (g) A boat license shall allow the sale of alcoholic 19liquor in individual drinks, on any passenger boat regularly 20operated as a common carrier on navigable waters in this State 21or on any riverboat operated under the Illinois Gambling Act, 22which boat or riverboat maintains a public dining room or 23restaurant thereon.24    (h) A non-beverage user's license shall allow the licensee 25to purchase alcoholic liquor from a licensed manufacturer or 26importing distributor, without the imposition of any tax upon   HB3172- 47 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1the business of such licensed manufacturer or importing 2distributor as to such alcoholic liquor to be used by such 3licensee solely for the non-beverage purposes set forth in 4subsection (a) of Section 8-1 of this Act, and such licenses 5shall be divided and classified and shall permit the purchase, 6possession and use of limited and stated quantities of 7alcoholic liquor as follows:8Class 1, not to exceed ......................... 500 gallons 9Class 2, not to exceed ....................... 1,000 gallons 10Class 3, not to exceed ....................... 5,000 gallons 11Class 4, not to exceed ...................... 10,000 gallons 12Class 5, not to exceed ....................... 50,000 gallons13    (i) A wine-maker's premises license shall allow a licensee 14that concurrently holds a first-class wine-maker's license to 15sell and offer for sale at retail in the premises specified in 16such license not more than 50,000 gallons of the first-class 17wine-maker's wine that is made at the first-class wine-maker's 18licensed premises per year for use or consumption, but not for 19resale in any form. A wine-maker's premises license shall 20allow a licensee who concurrently holds a second-class 21wine-maker's license to sell and offer for sale at retail in 22the premises specified in such license up to 100,000 gallons 23of the second-class wine-maker's wine that is made at the 24second-class wine-maker's licensed premises per year for use 25or consumption but not for resale in any form. A wine-maker's 26premises license shall allow a licensee who concurrently holds   HB3172- 48 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1a third-class wine-maker's license to sell and offer for sale 2at retail in the premises specified in such license up to 3250,000 gallons of the third-class wine-maker's wine that is 4made at the third-class wine-maker's licensed premises per 5year for use or consumption but not for resale in any form. A 6first-class wine-maker that concurrently holds a class 1 7brewer license or a class 1 craft distiller license shall not 8be eligible to hold a wine-maker's premises license. A 9wine-maker's premises license shall allow a licensee that 10concurrently holds a first-class wine-maker's license, or a 11second-class wine-maker's license, or a third-class 12wine-maker's license to sell and offer for sale at retail at 13the premises specified in the wine-maker's premises license, 14for use or consumption but not for resale in any form, any 15beer, wine, and spirits purchased from a licensed distributor. 16Upon approval from the State Commission, a wine-maker's 17premises license shall allow the licensee to sell and offer 18for sale at (i) the wine-maker's licensed premises and (ii) at 19up to 3 2 additional locations for use and consumption and not 20for resale. Each location shall require additional licensing 21per location as specified in Section 5-3 of this Act. A 22wine-maker's premises licensee shall secure liquor liability 23insurance coverage in an amount at least equal to the maximum 24liability amounts set forth in subsection (a) of Section 6-21 25of this Act. 26    (j) An airplane license shall permit the licensee to   HB3172- 49 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1import alcoholic liquors into this State from any point in the 2United States outside this State and to store such alcoholic 3liquors in this State; to make wholesale purchases of 4alcoholic liquors directly from manufacturers, foreign 5importers, distributors and importing distributors from within 6or outside this State; and to store such alcoholic liquors in 7this State; provided that the above powers may be exercised 8only in connection with the importation, purchase or storage 9of alcoholic liquors to be sold or dispensed on an airplane; 10and provided further, that airplane licensees exercising the 11above powers shall be subject to all provisions of Article 12VIII of this Act as applied to importing distributors. An 13airplane licensee shall also permit the sale or dispensing of 14alcoholic liquors on any passenger airplane regularly operated 15by a common carrier in this State, but shall not permit the 16sale for resale of any alcoholic liquors to any licensee 17within this State. A single airplane license shall be required 18of an airline company if liquor service is provided on board 19aircraft in this State. The annual fee for such license shall 20be as determined in Section 5-3.21    (k) A foreign importer's license shall permit such 22licensee to purchase alcoholic liquor from Illinois licensed 23non-resident dealers only, and to import alcoholic liquor 24other than in bulk from any point outside the United States and 25to sell such alcoholic liquor to Illinois licensed importing 26distributors and to no one else in Illinois; provided that (i)   HB3172- 50 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1the foreign importer registers with the State Commission every 2brand of alcoholic liquor that it proposes to sell to Illinois 3licensees during the license period, (ii) the foreign importer 4complies with all of the provisions of Section 6-9 of this Act 5with respect to registration of such Illinois licensees as may 6be granted the right to sell such brands at wholesale, and 7(iii) the foreign importer complies with the provisions of 8Sections 6-5 and 6-6 of this Act to the same extent that these 9provisions apply to manufacturers.10    (l) (i) A broker's license shall be required of all 11persons who solicit orders for, offer to sell or offer to 12supply alcoholic liquor to retailers in the State of Illinois, 13or who offer to retailers to ship or cause to be shipped or to 14make contact with distillers, craft distillers, rectifiers, 15brewers or manufacturers or any other party within or without 16the State of Illinois in order that alcoholic liquors be 17shipped to a distributor, importing distributor or foreign 18importer, whether such solicitation or offer is consummated 19within or without the State of Illinois.20    No holder of a retailer's license issued by the Illinois 21Liquor Control Commission shall purchase or receive any 22alcoholic liquor, the order for which was solicited or offered 23for sale to such retailer by a broker unless the broker is the 24holder of a valid broker's license.25    The broker shall, upon the acceptance by a retailer of the 26broker's solicitation of an order or offer to sell or supply or   HB3172- 51 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1deliver or have delivered alcoholic liquors, promptly forward 2to the Illinois Liquor Control Commission a notification of 3said transaction in such form as the Commission may by 4regulations prescribe.5    (ii) A broker's license shall be required of a person 6within this State, other than a retail licensee, who, for a fee 7or commission, promotes, solicits, or accepts orders for 8alcoholic liquor, for use or consumption and not for resale, 9to be shipped from this State and delivered to residents 10outside of this State by an express company, common carrier, 11or contract carrier. This Section does not apply to any person 12who promotes, solicits, or accepts orders for wine as 13specifically authorized in Section 6-29 of this Act.14    A broker's license under this subsection (l) shall not 15entitle the holder to buy or sell any alcoholic liquors for his 16own account or to take or deliver title to such alcoholic 17liquors.18    This subsection (l) shall not apply to distributors, 19employees of distributors, or employees of a manufacturer who 20has registered the trademark, brand or name of the alcoholic 21liquor pursuant to Section 6-9 of this Act, and who regularly 22sells such alcoholic liquor in the State of Illinois only to 23its registrants thereunder.24    Any agent, representative, or person subject to 25registration pursuant to subsection (a-1) of this Section 26shall not be eligible to receive a broker's license.  HB3172- 52 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    (m) A non-resident dealer's license shall permit such 2licensee to ship into and warehouse alcoholic liquor into this 3State from any point outside of this State, and to sell such 4alcoholic liquor to Illinois licensed foreign importers and 5importing distributors and to no one else in this State; 6provided that (i) said non-resident dealer shall register with 7the Illinois Liquor Control Commission each and every brand of 8alcoholic liquor which it proposes to sell to Illinois 9licensees during the license period, (ii) it shall comply with 10all of the provisions of Section 6-9 hereof with respect to 11registration of such Illinois licensees as may be granted the 12right to sell such brands at wholesale by duly filing such 13registration statement, thereby authorizing the non-resident 14dealer to proceed to sell such brands at wholesale, and (iii) 15the non-resident dealer shall comply with the provisions of 16Sections 6-5 and 6-6 of this Act to the same extent that these 17provisions apply to manufacturers. No person licensed as a 18non-resident dealer shall be granted a distributor's or 19importing distributor's license.20    (n) A brew pub license shall allow the licensee to only (i) 21manufacture up to 155,000 gallons of beer per year only on the 22premises specified in the license, (ii) make sales of the beer 23manufactured on the premises or, with the approval of the 24Commission, beer manufactured on another brew pub licensed 25premises that is wholly owned and operated by the same 26licensee to importing distributors, distributors, and to   HB3172- 53 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1non-licensees for use and consumption, (iii) store the beer 2upon the premises, (iv) sell and offer for sale at retail from 3the licensed premises for off-premises consumption no more 4than 155,000 gallons per year so long as such sales are only 5made in-person, (v) sell and offer for sale at retail for use 6and consumption on the premises specified in the license any 7form of alcoholic liquor purchased from a licensed distributor 8or importing distributor, (vi) with the prior approval of the 9Commission, annually transfer no more than 155,000 gallons of 10beer manufactured on the premises to a licensed brew pub 11wholly owned and operated by the same licensee, and (vii) 12notwithstanding item (i) of this subsection, brew pubs wholly 13owned and operated by the same licensee may combine each 14location's production limit of 155,000 gallons of beer per 15year and allocate the aggregate total between the wholly 16owned, operated, and licensed locations.17    A brew pub licensee shall not under any circumstance sell 18or offer for sale beer manufactured by the brew pub licensee to 19retail licensees. 20    A person who holds a class 2 brewer license may 21simultaneously hold a brew pub license if the class 2 brewer 22(i) does not, under any circumstance, sell or offer for sale 23beer manufactured by the class 2 brewer to retail licensees; 24(ii) does not hold more than 3 brew pub licenses in this State; 25(iii) does not manufacture more than a combined 3,720,000 26gallons of beer per year, including the beer manufactured at   HB3172- 54 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1the brew pub; and (iv) is not a member of or affiliated with, 2directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 33,720,000 gallons of beer per year or any other alcoholic 4liquor.5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 6licensed brewer, class 2 brewer, or non-resident dealer who 7before July 1, 2015 manufactured less than 3,720,000 gallons 8of beer per year and held a brew pub license on or before July 91, 2015 may (i) continue to qualify for and hold that brew pub 10license for the licensed premises and (ii) manufacture more 11than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year and continue to 12qualify for and hold that brew pub license if that brewer, 13class 2 brewer, or non-resident dealer does not simultaneously 14hold a class 1 brewer license and is not a member of or 15affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 16produces more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year or that 17produces any other alcoholic liquor. 18    A brew pub licensee may apply for a class 3 brewer license 19and, upon meeting all applicable qualifications of this Act 20and relinquishing all commonly owned brew pub or retail 21licenses, shall be issued a class 3 brewer license. Nothing in 22this Act shall prohibit the issuance of a class 3 brewer 23license if the applicant:24        (1) has a valid retail license on or before May 1, 25    2021;26        (2) has an ownership interest in at least two brew   HB3172- 55 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    pubs licenses on or before May 1, 2021;2        (3) the brew pub licensee applies for a class 3 brewer 3    license on or before October 1, 2022 and relinquishes all 4    commonly owned brew pub licenses; and5        (4) relinquishes all commonly owned retail licenses on 6    or before December 31, 2022.7    If a brew pub licensee is issued a class 3 brewer license, 8the class 3 brewer license shall expire on the same date as the 9existing brew pub license and the State Commission shall not 10require a class 3 brewer licensee to obtain a brewer license, 11or in the alternative to pay a fee for a brewer license, until 12the date the brew pub license of the applicant would have 13expired. 14    (o) A caterer retailer license shall allow the holder to 15serve alcoholic liquors as an incidental part of a food 16service that serves prepared meals which excludes the serving 17of snacks as the primary meal, either on or off-site whether 18licensed or unlicensed. A caterer retailer license shall allow 19the holder, a distributor, or an importing distributor to 20transfer any inventory to and from the holder's retail 21premises and shall allow the holder to purchase alcoholic 22liquor from a distributor or importing distributor to be 23delivered directly to an off-site event.24    Nothing in this Act prohibits a distributor or importing 25distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 26salable beer to a holder of a caterer retailer license or a   HB3172- 56 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1caterer retailer licensee from accepting a credit or refund 2for unused, salable beer, in the event an act of God is the 3sole reason an off-site event is cancelled and if: (i) the 4holder of a caterer retailer license has not transferred 5alcoholic liquor from its caterer retailer premises to an 6off-site location; (ii) the distributor or importing 7distributor offers the credit or refund for the unused, 8salable beer that it delivered to the off-site premises and 9not for any unused, salable beer that the distributor or 10importing distributor delivered to the caterer retailer's 11premises; and (iii) the unused, salable beer would likely 12spoil if transferred to the caterer retailer's premises. A 13caterer retailer license shall allow the holder to transfer 14any inventory from any off-site location to its caterer 15retailer premises at the conclusion of an off-site event or 16engage a distributor or importing distributor to transfer any 17inventory from any off-site location to its caterer retailer 18premises at the conclusion of an off-site event, provided that 19the distributor or importing distributor issues bona fide 20charges to the caterer retailer licensee for fuel, labor, and 21delivery and the distributor or importing distributor collects 22payment from the caterer retailer licensee prior to the 23distributor or importing distributor transferring inventory to 24the caterer retailer premises.25    For purposes of this subsection (o), an "act of God" means 26an unforeseeable event, such as a rain or snow storm, hail, a   HB3172- 57 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1flood, or a similar event, that is the sole cause of the 2cancellation of an off-site, outdoor event.3    (p) An auction liquor license shall allow the licensee to 4sell and offer for sale at auction wine and spirits for use or 5consumption, or for resale by an Illinois liquor licensee in 6accordance with provisions of this Act. An auction liquor 7license will be issued to a person and it will permit the 8auction liquor licensee to hold the auction anywhere in the 9State. An auction liquor license must be obtained for each 10auction at least 14 days in advance of the auction date.11    (q) A special use permit license shall allow an Illinois 12licensed retailer to transfer a portion of its alcoholic 13liquor inventory from its retail licensed premises to the 14premises specified in the license hereby created; to purchase 15alcoholic liquor from a distributor or importing distributor 16to be delivered directly to the location specified in the 17license hereby created; and to sell or offer for sale at 18retail, only in the premises specified in the license hereby 19created, the transferred or delivered alcoholic liquor for use 20or consumption, but not for resale in any form. A special use 21permit license may be granted for the following time periods: 22one day or less; 2 or more days to a maximum of 15 days per 23location in any 12-month period. An applicant for the special 24use permit license must also submit with the application proof 25satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant will 26provide dram shop liability insurance to the maximum limits   HB3172- 58 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1and have local authority approval.2    A special use permit license shall allow the holder to 3transfer any inventory from the holder's special use premises 4to its retail premises at the conclusion of the special use 5event or engage a distributor or importing distributor to 6transfer any inventory from the holder's special use premises 7to its retail premises at the conclusion of an off-site event, 8provided that the distributor or importing distributor issues 9bona fide charges to the special use permit licensee for fuel, 10labor, and delivery and the distributor or importing 11distributor collects payment from the retail licensee prior to 12the distributor or importing distributor transferring 13inventory to the retail premises.14    Nothing in this Act prohibits a distributor or importing 15distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 16salable beer to a special use permit licensee or a special use 17permit licensee from accepting a credit or refund for unused, 18salable beer at the conclusion of the event specified in the 19license if: (i) the holder of the special use permit license 20has not transferred alcoholic liquor from its retail licensed 21premises to the premises specified in the special use permit 22license; (ii) the distributor or importing distributor offers 23the credit or refund for the unused, salable beer that it 24delivered to the premises specified in the special use permit 25license and not for any unused, salable beer that the 26distributor or importing distributor delivered to the   HB3172- 59 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1retailer's premises; and (iii) the unused, salable beer would 2likely spoil if transferred to the retailer premises.3    (r) A winery shipper's license shall allow a person with a 4first-class wine-maker's license, a or second-class 5wine-maker's license, a third-class wine manufacturer's 6license, a first-class or second-class wine-maker's license, 7or a limited wine manufacturer's license or who is licensed to 8make wine under the laws of another state to ship wine made by 9that licensee directly to a resident of this State who is 21 10years of age or older for that resident's personal use and not 11for resale. Prior to receiving a winery shipper's license, an 12applicant for the license must provide the Commission with a 13true copy of its current license in any state in which it is 14licensed as a manufacturer of wine. An applicant for a winery 15shipper's license must also complete an application form that 16provides any other information the Commission deems necessary. 17The application form shall include all addresses from which 18the applicant for a winery shipper's license intends to ship 19wine, including the name and address of any third party, 20except for a common carrier, authorized to ship wine on behalf 21of the manufacturer. The application form shall include an 22acknowledgement consenting to the jurisdiction of the 23Commission, the Illinois Department of Revenue, and the courts 24of this State concerning the enforcement of this Act and any 25related laws, rules, and regulations, including authorizing 26the Department of Revenue and the Commission to conduct audits   HB3172- 60 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1for the purpose of ensuring compliance with Public Act 95-634, 2and an acknowledgement that the wine manufacturer is in 3compliance with Section 6-2 of this Act. Any third party, 4except for a common carrier, authorized to ship wine on behalf 5of a first-class or second-class wine manufacturer's licensee, 6a first-class wine-maker's licensee, a or second-class 7wine-maker's licensee, a third-class wine-maker's licensee, a 8limited wine manufacturer's licensee, or a person who is 9licensed to make wine under the laws of another state shall 10also be disclosed by the winery shipper's licensee, and a copy 11of the written appointment of the third-party wine provider, 12except for a common carrier, to the wine manufacturer shall be 13filed with the State Commission as a supplement to the winery 14shipper's license application or any renewal thereof. The 15winery shipper's license holder shall affirm under penalty of 16perjury, as part of the winery shipper's license application 17or renewal, that he or she only ships wine, either directly or 18indirectly through a third-party provider, from the licensee's 19own production.20    Except for a common carrier, a third-party provider 21shipping wine on behalf of a winery shipper's license holder 22is the agent of the winery shipper's license holder and, as 23such, a winery shipper's license holder is responsible for the 24acts and omissions of the third-party provider acting on 25behalf of the license holder. A third-party provider, except 26for a common carrier, that engages in shipping wine into   HB3172- 61 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1Illinois on behalf of a winery shipper's license holder shall 2consent to the jurisdiction of the State Commission and the 3State. Any third-party, except for a common carrier, holding 4such an appointment shall, by February 1 of each calendar year 5and upon request by the State Commission or the Department of 6Revenue, file with the State Commission a statement detailing 7each shipment made to an Illinois resident. The statement 8shall include the name and address of the third-party provider 9filing the statement, the time period covered by the 10statement, and the following information: 11        (1) the name, address, and license number of the 12    winery shipper on whose behalf the shipment was made;13        (2) the quantity of the products delivered; and14        (3) the date and address of the shipment. 15If the Department of Revenue or the State Commission requests 16a statement under this paragraph, the third-party provider 17must provide that statement no later than 30 days after the 18request is made. Any books, records, supporting papers, and 19documents containing information and data relating to a 20statement under this paragraph shall be kept and preserved for 21a period of 3 years, unless their destruction sooner is 22authorized, in writing, by the Director of Revenue, and shall 23be open and available to inspection by the Director of Revenue 24or the State Commission or any duly authorized officer, agent, 25or employee of the State Commission or the Department of 26Revenue, at all times during business hours of the day. Any   HB3172- 62 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1person who violates any provision of this paragraph or any 2rule of the State Commission for the administration and 3enforcement of the provisions of this paragraph is guilty of a 4Class C misdemeanor. In case of a continuing violation, each 5day's continuance thereof shall be a separate and distinct 6offense. 7    The State Commission shall adopt rules as soon as 8practicable to implement the requirements of Public Act 99-904 9and shall adopt rules prohibiting any such third-party 10appointment of a third-party provider, except for a common 11carrier, that has been deemed by the State Commission to have 12violated the provisions of this Act with regard to any winery 13shipper licensee.14    A winery shipper licensee must pay to the Department of 15Revenue the State liquor gallonage tax under Section 8-1 for 16all wine that is sold by the licensee and shipped to a person 17in this State. For the purposes of Section 8-1, a winery 18shipper licensee shall be taxed in the same manner as a 19manufacturer of wine. A licensee who is not otherwise required 20to register under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act must 21register under the Use Tax Act to collect and remit use tax to 22the Department of Revenue for all gallons of wine that are sold 23by the licensee and shipped to persons in this State. If a 24licensee fails to remit the tax imposed under this Act in 25accordance with the provisions of Article VIII of this Act, 26the winery shipper's license shall be revoked in accordance   HB3172- 63 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1with the provisions of Article VII of this Act. If a licensee 2fails to properly register and remit tax under the Use Tax Act 3or the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act for all wine that is sold 4by the winery shipper and shipped to persons in this State, the 5winery shipper's license shall be revoked in accordance with 6the provisions of Article VII of this Act.7    A winery shipper licensee must collect, maintain, and 8submit to the Commission on a semi-annual basis the total 9number of cases per resident of wine shipped to residents of 10this State. A winery shipper licensed under this subsection 11(r) must comply with the requirements of Section 6-29 of this 12Act.13    Pursuant to paragraph (5.1) or (5.3) of subsection (a) of 14Section 3-12, the State Commission may receive, respond to, 15and investigate any complaint and impose any of the remedies 16specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12.17    As used in this subsection, "third-party provider" means 18any entity that provides fulfillment house services, including 19warehousing, packaging, distribution, order processing, or 20shipment of wine, but not the sale of wine, on behalf of a 21licensed winery shipper. 22    (s) A craft distiller tasting permit license shall allow 23an Illinois licensed class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 24distiller to transfer a portion of its alcoholic liquor 25inventory from its class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 26distiller licensed premises to the premises specified in the   HB3172- 64 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1license hereby created and to conduct a sampling, only in the 2premises specified in the license hereby created, of the 3transferred alcoholic liquor in accordance with subsection (c) 4of Section 6-31 of this Act. The transferred alcoholic liquor 5may not be sold or resold in any form. An applicant for the 6craft distiller tasting permit license must also submit with 7the application proof satisfactory to the State Commission 8that the applicant will provide dram shop liability insurance 9to the maximum limits and have local authority approval.10    (t) A brewer warehouse permit may be issued to the holder 11of a class 1 brewer license or a class 2 brewer license. If the 12holder of the permit is a class 1 brewer licensee, the brewer 13warehouse permit shall allow the holder to store or warehouse 14up to 930,000 gallons of tax-determined beer manufactured by 15the holder of the permit at the premises specified on the 16permit. If the holder of the permit is a class 2 brewer 17licensee, the brewer warehouse permit shall allow the holder 18to store or warehouse up to 3,720,000 gallons of 19tax-determined beer manufactured by the holder of the permit 20at the premises specified on the permit. Sales to 21non-licensees are prohibited at the premises specified in the 22brewer warehouse permit. 23    (u) A distilling pub license shall allow the licensee to 24only (i) manufacture up to 5,000 gallons of spirits per year 25only on the premises specified in the license, (ii) make sales 26of the spirits manufactured on the premises or, with the   HB3172- 65 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1approval of the State Commission, spirits manufactured on 2another distilling pub licensed premises that is wholly owned 3and operated by the same licensee to importing distributors 4and distributors and to non-licensees for use and consumption, 5(iii) store the spirits upon the premises, (iv) sell and offer 6for sale at retail from the licensed premises for off-premises 7consumption no more than 5,000 gallons per year so long as such 8sales are only made in-person, (v) sell and offer for sale at 9retail for use and consumption on the premises specified in 10the license any form of alcoholic liquor purchased from a 11licensed distributor or importing distributor, and (vi) with 12the prior approval of the State Commission, annually transfer 13no more than 5,000 gallons of spirits manufactured on the 14premises to a licensed distilling pub wholly owned and 15operated by the same licensee. 16    A distilling pub licensee shall not under any circumstance 17sell or offer for sale spirits manufactured by the distilling 18pub licensee to retail licensees. 19    A person who holds a class 2 craft distiller license may 20simultaneously hold a distilling pub license if the class 2 21craft distiller (i) does not, under any circumstance, sell or 22offer for sale spirits manufactured by the class 2 craft 23distiller to retail licensees; (ii) does not hold more than 3 24distilling pub licenses in this State; (iii) does not 25manufacture more than a combined 100,000 gallons of spirits 26per year, including the spirits manufactured at the distilling   HB3172- 66 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1pub; and (iv) is not a member of or affiliated with, directly 2or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 3gallons of spirits per year or any other alcoholic liquor. 4    (v) A craft distiller warehouse permit may be issued to 5the holder of a class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 6distiller license. The craft distiller warehouse permit shall 7allow the holder to store or warehouse up to 500,000 gallons of 8spirits manufactured by the holder of the permit at the 9premises specified on the permit. Sales to non-licensees are 10prohibited at the premises specified in the craft distiller 11warehouse permit. 12    (w) A beer showcase permit license shall allow an 13Illinois-licensed distributor to transfer a portion of its 14beer inventory from its licensed premises to the premises 15specified in the beer showcase permit license, and, in the 16case of a class 3 brewer, transfer only beer the class 3 brewer 17manufactures from its licensed premises to the premises 18specified in the beer showcase permit license; and to sell or 19offer for sale at retail, only in the premises specified in the 20beer showcase permit license, the transferred or delivered 21beer for on or off premise consumption, but not for resale in 22any form and to sell to non-licensees not more than 96 fluid 23ounces of beer per person. A beer showcase permit license may 24be granted for the following time periods: one day or less; or 252 or more days to a maximum of 15 days per location in any 2612-month period. An applicant for a beer showcase permit   HB3172- 67 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1license must also submit with the application proof 2satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant will 3provide dram shop liability insurance to the maximum limits 4and have local authority approval. The State Commission shall 5require the beer showcase applicant to comply with Section 66-27.1. 7(Source: P.A. 101-16, eff. 6-14-19; 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 8101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-482, eff. 8-23-19; 101-517, eff. 98-23-19; 101-615, eff. 12-20-19; 101-668, eff. 1-1-22; 10102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1142, eff. 2-17-23.) 11    (235 ILCS 5/5-3)  (from Ch. 43, par. 118)12    Sec. 5-3. License fees. Except as otherwise provided 13herein, at the time application is made to the State 14Commission for a license of any class, the applicant shall pay 15to the State Commission the fee hereinafter provided for the 16kind of license applied for.17    The fee for licenses issued by the State Commission shall 18be as follows:19OnlineInitial20renewallicense21 or22 non-online23 renewal24    For a manufacturer's license:25    Class 1. Distiller .................$4,000$5,000  HB3172- 68 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    Class 2. Rectifier .................4,000 5,0002    Class 3. Brewer ....................1,200 1,5003    Class 4. First-class Wine 4        Manufacturer ...................7509005    Class 5. Second-class6        Wine Manufacturer ..............1,500 1,7507    Class 6. First-class wine-maker ....750 9008    Class 7. Second-class wine-maker ...1,500 1,7509    Class 8. Limited Wine 10        Manufacturer....................250 350 11    Class 9. Craft Distiller........... 2,000 2,500 12    Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller.. 50 75 13    Class 11. Class 2 Craft Distiller.. 75 100 14    Class 12. Class 1 Brewer............50 7515    Class 13. Class 2 Brewer........... 75 100 16    Class 14. Class 3 Brewer........... 25 50 17    Class 15. Third-class wine-maker.1,500 1,750 18    For a Brew Pub License..............1,2001,50019    For a Distilling Pub License....... 1,200 1,500 20    For a caterer retailer's license....350 50021    For a foreign importer's license ...25 2522    For an importing distributor's 23        license.........................252524    For a distributor's license 25        (11,250,000 gallons 26        or over).......................1,4502,200  HB3172- 69 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    For a distributor's license 2        (over 4,500,000 gallons, but3        under 11,250,000 gallons)...... 9501,4504    For a distributor's license5        (4,500,000 gallons or under)....3004506    For a non-resident dealer's license7        (500,000 gallons or over) 8        or with self-distribution 9        privileges .....................1,200 1,50010    For a non-resident dealer's license11        (under 500,000 gallons) ........250 35012    For a wine-maker's premises 13        license ........................25050014    For a winery shipper's license15        (under 250,000 gallons).........200 35016    For a winery shipper's license 17        (250,000 or over, but 18        under 500,000 gallons)..........7501,00019    For a winery shipper's license 20        (500,000 gallons or over).......1,200 1,50021    For a wine-maker's premises 22        license, second location .......500 1,00023    For a wine-maker's premises 24        license, third location ........5001,00025    For a wine-maker's premises26    license, fourth location.500 1,000   HB3172- 70 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    For a retailer's license ...........600 7502    For a special event retailer's3        license, (not-for-profit) ......25 254    For a beer showcase permit, 5        one day only .................. 100 150 6        2 days or more ................ 150 250 7    For a special use permit license,8        one day only ...................100 1509        2 days or more .................150 25010    For a railroad license .............100 15011    For a boat license .................500 1,00012    For an airplane license, times the13        licensee's maximum number of 14        aircraft in flight, serving 15        liquor over the State at any 16        given time, which either 17        originate, terminate, or make 18        an intermediate stop in 19        the State......................10015020    For a non-beverage user's license:21        Class 1 ........................242422        Class 2 ........................606023        Class 3 ........................12012024        Class 4 ........................24024025        Class 5 ........................60060026    For a broker's license .............750 1,000  HB3172- 71 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    For an auction liquor license ......100 1502    For a homebrewer special 3        event permit....................25254    For a craft distiller 5        tasting permit..................25 256    For a BASSET trainer license....... 300 3507    For a tasting representative 8        license........................2003009    For a brewer warehouse permit...... 252510    For a craft distiller 11        warehouse permit................25 25 12    Fees collected under this Section shall be paid into the 13Dram Shop Fund. The State Commission shall waive license 14renewal fees for those retailers' licenses that are designated 15as "1A" by the State Commission and expire on or after July 1, 162022, and on or before June 30, 2023. One-half of the funds 17received for a retailer's license shall be paid into the Dram 18Shop Fund and one-half of the funds received for a retailer's 19license shall be paid into the General Revenue Fund.20    No fee shall be paid for licenses issued by the State 21Commission to the following non-beverage users:22        (a) Hospitals, sanitariums, or clinics when their use 23    of alcoholic liquor is exclusively medicinal, mechanical, 24    or scientific.25        (b) Universities, colleges of learning, or schools 26    when their use of alcoholic liquor is exclusively   HB3172- 72 -LRB104 08306 RPS 18357 b1    medicinal, mechanical, or scientific.2        (c) Laboratories when their use is exclusively for the 3    purpose of scientific research.4(Source: P.A. 102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 5102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1142, eff. 2-17-23; 103-154, eff. 66-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)